Illinois, session 104th, HB5304.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Funds Investment Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 235/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 902)7    Sec. 2. Authorized investments. 8    (a) Any public agency may invest any public funds as 9follows:10        (1) in bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, 11    treasury bills or other securities now or hereafter 12    issued, which are guaranteed by the full faith and credit 13    of the United States of America as to principal and 14    interest;15        (2) in bonds, notes, debentures, or other similar 16    obligations of the United States of America, its agencies, 17    and its instrumentalities;18        (3) in interest-bearing savings accounts, 19    interest-bearing certificates of deposit or 20    interest-bearing time deposits or any other investments 21    constituting direct obligations of any bank as defined by 22    the Illinois Banking Act;23        (4) in short-term obligations of corporations   HB5304- 2 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1    organized in the United States with assets exceeding 2    $500,000,000 if (i) such obligations are rated at the time 3    of purchase at one of the 3 highest classifications 4    established by at least 2 standard rating services and 5    which mature not later than 270 days from the date of 6    purchase, (ii) such purchases do not exceed 10% of the 7    corporation's outstanding obligations, and (iii) no more 8    than one-third of the public agency's funds may be 9    invested in short-term obligations of corporations under 10    this paragraph (4);11        (4.5) in obligations of corporations organized in the 12    United States with assets exceeding $500,000,000 if (i) 13    such obligations are rated at the time of purchase at one 14    of the 3 highest classifications established by at least 2 15    standard rating services and which mature more than 270 16    days but less than 10 years from the date of purchase, (ii) 17    such purchases do not exceed 10% of the corporation's 18    outstanding obligations, and (iii) no more than one-third 19    of the public agency's funds may be invested in 20    obligations of corporations under this paragraph (4.5); or 21        (5) in money market mutual funds registered under the 22    Investment Company Act of 1940, provided that the 23    portfolio of any such money market mutual fund is limited 24    to obligations described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this 25    subsection and to agreements to repurchase such 26    obligations; or .  HB5304- 3 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1        (6) in any security that matures or that may be 2    tendered for purchase at the option of the holder within 3    not more than 7 years of the date on which it is acquired 4    and that has the highest rating category (AAA) assigned by 5    Standard & Poor's corporation, Moody's investors service, 6    or other similar nationally recognized statistical rating 7    organization. 8    (a-1) In addition to any other investments authorized 9under this Act, a municipality, park district, forest preserve 10district, conservation district, county, or other governmental 11unit may invest its public funds in interest bearing bonds of 12any county, township, city, village, incorporated town, 13municipal corporation, or school district, of the State of 14Illinois, of any other state, or of any political subdivision 15or agency of the State of Illinois or of any other state, 16whether the interest earned thereon is taxable or tax-exempt 17under federal law. The bonds shall be registered in the name of 18the municipality, park district, forest preserve district, 19conservation district, county, or other governmental unit, or 20held under a custodial agreement at a bank. The bonds shall be 21rated at the time of purchase within the 4 highest general 22classifications established by a rating service of nationally 23recognized expertise in rating bonds of states and their 24political subdivisions.25    (b) Investments may be made only in banks which are 26insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any   HB5304- 4 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1public agency may invest any public funds in short term 2discount obligations of the Federal National Mortgage 3Association or in shares or other forms of securities legally 4issuable by savings banks or savings and loan associations 5incorporated under the laws of this State or any other state or 6under the laws of the United States. Investments may be made 7only in those savings banks or savings and loan associations 8the shares, or investment certificates of which are insured by 9the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any such securities 10may be purchased at the offering or market price thereof at the 11time of such purchase. All such securities so purchased shall 12mature or be redeemable on a date or dates prior to the time 13when, in the judgment of such governing authority, the public 14funds so invested will be required for expenditure by such 15public agency or its governing authority. The expressed 16judgment of any such governing authority as to the time when 17any public funds will be required for expenditure or be 18redeemable is final and conclusive. Any public agency may 19invest any public funds in dividend-bearing share accounts, 20share certificate accounts or class of share accounts of a 21credit union chartered under the laws of this State or the laws 22of the United States; provided, however, the principal office 23of any such credit union must be located within the State of 24Illinois. Investments may be made only in those credit unions 25the accounts of which are insured by applicable law.26    (c) For purposes of this Section, the term "agencies of   HB5304- 5 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1the United States of America" includes: (i) the federal land 2banks, federal intermediate credit banks, banks for 3cooperative, federal farm credit banks, or any other entity 4authorized to issue debt obligations under the Farm Credit Act 5of 1971 (12 U.S.C. 2001 et seq.) and Acts amendatory thereto; 6(ii) the federal home loan banks and the federal home loan 7mortgage corporation; and (iii) any other agency created by 8Act of Congress.9    (d) Except for pecuniary interests permitted under 10subsection (f) of Section 3-14-4 of the Illinois Municipal 11Code or under Section 3.2 of the Public Officer Prohibited 12Practices Act, no person acting as treasurer or financial 13officer or who is employed in any similar capacity by or for a 14public agency may do any of the following:15        (1) have any interest, directly or indirectly, in any 16    investments in which the agency is authorized to invest.17        (2) have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the 18    sellers, sponsors, or managers of those investments.19        (3) receive, in any manner, compensation of any kind 20    from any investments in which the agency is authorized to 21    invest.22    (e) Any public agency may also invest any public funds in a 23Public Treasurers' Investment Pool created under Section 17 of 24the State Treasurer Act. Any public agency may also invest any 25public funds in a fund managed, operated, and administered by 26a bank, subsidiary of a bank, or subsidiary of a bank holding   HB5304- 6 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1company or use the services of such an entity to hold and 2invest or advise regarding the investment of any public funds.3    (f) To the extent a public agency has custody of funds not 4owned by it or another public agency and does not otherwise 5have authority to invest such funds, the public agency may 6invest such funds as if they were its own. Such funds must be 7released to the appropriate person at the earliest reasonable 8time, but in no case exceeding 31 days, after the private 9person becomes entitled to the receipt of them. All earnings 10accruing on any investments or deposits made pursuant to the 11provisions of this Act shall be credited to the public agency 12by or for which such investments or deposits were made, except 13as provided otherwise in Section 4.1 of the State Finance Act 14or the Local Governmental Tax Collection Act, and except where 15by specific statutory provisions such earnings are directed to 16be credited to and paid to a particular fund.17    (g) A public agency may purchase or invest in repurchase 18agreements of government securities having the meaning set out 19in the Government Securities Act of 1986, as now or hereafter 20amended or succeeded, subject to the provisions of said Act 21and the regulations issued thereunder. The government 22securities, unless registered or inscribed in the name of the 23public agency, shall be purchased through banks or trust 24companies authorized to do business in the State of Illinois.25    (h) Except for repurchase agreements of government 26securities which are subject to the Government Securities Act   HB5304- 7 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1of 1986, as now or hereafter amended or succeeded, no public 2agency may purchase or invest in instruments which constitute 3repurchase agreements, and no financial institution may enter 4into such an agreement with or on behalf of any public agency 5unless the instrument and the transaction meet the following 6requirements:7        (1) The securities, unless registered or inscribed in 8    the name of the public agency, are purchased through banks 9    or trust companies authorized to do business in the State 10    of Illinois.11        (2) An authorized public officer after ascertaining 12    which firm will give the most favorable rate of interest, 13    directs the custodial bank to "purchase" specified 14    securities from a designated institution. The "custodial 15    bank" is the bank or trust company, or agency of 16    government, which acts for the public agency in connection 17    with repurchase agreements involving the investment of 18    funds by the public agency. The State Treasurer may act as 19    custodial bank for public agencies executing repurchase 20    agreements. To the extent the Treasurer acts in this 21    capacity, he is hereby authorized to pass through to such 22    public agencies any charges assessed by the Federal 23    Reserve Bank.24        (3) A custodial bank must be a member bank of the 25    Federal Reserve System or maintain accounts with member 26    banks. All transfers of book-entry securities must be   HB5304- 8 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1    accomplished on a Reserve Bank's computer records through 2    a member bank of the Federal Reserve System. These 3    securities must be credited to the public agency on the 4    records of the custodial bank and the transaction must be 5    confirmed in writing to the public agency by the custodial 6    bank.7        (4) Trading partners shall be limited to banks or 8    trust companies authorized to do business in the State of 9    Illinois or to registered primary reporting dealers.10        (5) The security interest must be perfected.11        (6) The public agency enters into a written master 12    repurchase agreement which outlines the basic 13    responsibilities and liabilities of both buyer and seller.14        (7) Agreements shall be for periods of 330 days or 15    less.16        (8) The authorized public officer of the public agency 17    informs the custodial bank in writing of the maturity 18    details of the repurchase agreement.19        (9) The custodial bank must take delivery of and 20    maintain the securities in its custody for the account of 21    the public agency and confirm the transaction in writing 22    to the public agency. The Custodial Undertaking shall 23    provide that the custodian takes possession of the 24    securities exclusively for the public agency; that the 25    securities are free of any claims against the trading 26    partner; and any claims by the custodian are subordinate   HB5304- 9 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1    to the public agency's claims to rights to those 2    securities.3        (10) The obligations purchased by a public agency may 4    only be sold or presented for redemption or payment by the 5    fiscal agent bank or trust company holding the obligations 6    upon the written instruction of the public agency or 7    officer authorized to make such investments.8        (11) The custodial bank shall be liable to the public 9    agency for any monetary loss suffered by the public agency 10    due to the failure of the custodial bank to take and 11    maintain possession of such securities.12    (i) Notwithstanding the foregoing restrictions on 13investment in instruments constituting repurchase agreements 14the Illinois Housing Development Authority may invest in, and 15any financial institution with capital of at least 16$250,000,000 may act as custodian for, instruments that 17constitute repurchase agreements, provided that the Illinois 18Housing Development Authority, in making each such investment, 19complies with the safety and soundness guidelines for engaging 20in repurchase transactions applicable to federally insured 21banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations or other 22depository institutions as set forth in the Federal Financial 23Institutions Examination Council Policy Statement Regarding 24Repurchase Agreements and any regulations issued, or which may 25be issued by the supervisory federal authority pertaining 26thereto and any amendments thereto; provided further that the   HB5304- 10 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1securities shall be either (i) direct general obligations of, 2or obligations the payment of the principal of and/or interest 3on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States 4of America or (ii) any obligations of any agency, corporation 5or subsidiary thereof controlled or supervised by and acting 6as an instrumentality of the United States Government pursuant 7to authority granted by the Congress of the United States and 8provided further that the security interest must be perfected 9by either the Illinois Housing Development Authority, its 10custodian or its agent receiving possession of the securities 11either physically or transferred through a nationally 12recognized book entry system.13    (j) In addition to all other investments authorized under 14this Section, a community college district may invest public 15funds in any mutual funds that invest primarily in corporate 16investment grade or global government short term bonds. 17Purchases of mutual funds that invest primarily in global 18government short term bonds shall be limited to funds with 19assets of at least $100 million and that are rated at the time 20of purchase as one of the 10 highest classifications 21established by a recognized rating service. The investments 22shall be subject to approval by the local community college 23board of trustees. Each community college board of trustees 24shall develop a policy regarding the percentage of the 25college's investment portfolio that can be invested in such 26funds.  HB5304- 11 -LRB104 17270 HLH 30692 b1    (k) In addition to all other investments authorized under 2this Section, a public agency may adopt an ordinance or 3resolution to allow for investment of public funds in other 4instruments not specifically listed in this Section provided 5that those investments comply with (i) any other law that 6authorizes public agencies to invest funds and (ii) the 7investment policy adopted by the public agency under Section 82.5 of this Act. 9    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize an 10intergovernmental risk management entity to accept the deposit 11of public funds except for risk management purposes.12(Source: P.A. 102-285, eff. 8-6-21; 103-880, eff. 1-1-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.